Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2769.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 9, chapter 4, article 6, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 9-461.21, to read: START_STATUTE9-461.21. Residential planning; state tree Notwithstanding any other law, a municipality may not adopt a land use regulation or general or specific plan PROVISION, enforce any ordinance, code or regulation OR impose as a condition for approving a building or use permit any regulation that prohibits or restricts the use or placement of the state tree as prescribed in section 41-856 in a residential housing development. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 11, chapter 6, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 11-810.02, to read: START_STATUTE11-810.02. Residential planning; state tree Notwithstanding any other law, a county may not adopt a land use regulation or general or specific plan PROVISION, enforce any ordinance, code or regulation OR impose as a condition for approving a building or use permit any regulation that prohibits or restricts the use or placement of the state tree as prescribed in section 41-856 in a residential housing development. END_STATUTE